Nevada, session 83, AB149.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 678A.450 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
678A.450 1. The Board may adopt regulations necessary or
convenient to carry out the provisions of this title. Such regulations
may include, without limitation:
(a) Financial requirements for licensees.
(b) Establishing such education, outreach, investigative and
enforcement mechanisms as the Board deems necessary to ensure
the compliance of a licensee or registrant with the provisions of this
title. Such mechanisms must include, without limitation:
(1) A system to educate, train and certify employees of the
Board which:
(I) Each employee must complete before he or she may
engage in inspections, investigations or audits; and
(II) At a minimum, includes training that is the same or
substantially similar to any training that is required by the Board by
regulation to be completed by a cannabis establishment agent before
he or she may be employed by, volunteer at or provide labor to a
cannabis establishment;
(2) A system to educate and advise licensees and registrants
on compliance with the provisions of this title which may serve as
an alternative to disciplinary action; and
(3) Establishing specific grounds for disciplinary action
against a licensee or registrant who knowingly violates the law or
engages in grossly negligent, unlawful or criminal conduct or an act
or omission that poses an imminent threat to the health or safety of
the public.
(c) Requirements for licensees or registrants relating to the
cultivation, processing, manufacture, transport, distribution, testing,
study, advertising and sale of cannabis and cannabis products.
(d) Policies and procedures to ensure that the cannabis industry
in this State is economically competitive, inclusive of racial
minorities, women and persons and communities that have been
adversely affected by cannabis prohibition and accessible to persons
of low-income seeking to start a business.
(e) Policies and procedures relating to the disclosure of the
identities of the shareholders and the annual report of a cannabis
establishment that is a publicly traded company.
(f) Reasonable restrictions on the signage, marketing, display
and advertising of cannabis establishments. Such a restriction must
not require a cannabis establishment to obtain the approval of the
Board before using a logo, sign or advertisement.
-
*AB149_R1*

– 3 –
(g) Provisions governing the sales of products and commodities
made from hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, or containing
cannabidiol by cannabis establishments.
(h) Requirements relating to the packaging and labeling of
cannabis and cannabis products.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the
gathering and maintenance of comprehensive demographic
information, including, without limitation, information regarding
race, ethnicity, age and gender, concerning each:
(a) Owner and manager of a cannabis establishment.
(b) Holder of a cannabis establishment agent registration card.
3. The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the
investigation of unlicensed cannabis activities and the imposition of
penalties against persons who engage in such activities. Such
regulations must, without limitation:
(a) Establish penalties to be imposed for unlicensed cannabis
activities, which may include, without limitation, the issuance of a
cease and desist order or citation, the imposition of an
administrative fine or civil penalty and other similar penalties.
(b) Set forth the procedures by which the Board may impose a
penalty against a person for engaging in unlicensed cannabis
activities.
(c) Set forth the circumstances under which the Board is
required to refer matters concerning unlicensed cannabis activities
to an appropriate state or local law enforcement agency.
4. The Board shall transmit the information gathered and
maintained pursuant to subsection 2 to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Legislature on or
before January 1 of each odd-numbered year.
5. The Board shall, by regulation, establish a pilot program for
identifying opportunities for an emerging small cannabis business to
participate in the cannabis industry. As used in this subsection,
“emerging small cannabis business” means a cannabis-related
business that:
(a) Is in existence, operational and operated for a profit;
(b) Maintains its principal place of business in this State; and
(c) Satisfies requirements for the number of employees and
annual gross revenue established by the Board by regulation.
6. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing procedures
pursuant to which the Board may enter into an agreement with a
research institution to share information and data maintained by
the Board, including, without limitation, information and data
classified as confidential pursuant to NRS 678A.470, for the
purposes of research relating to cannabis and the cannabis
industry. As used in this subsection, “research institution” means
-
*AB149_R1*

– 4 –
a university, college or other organization which has as one of its
principal purposes the conducting of medical, scientific or
academic research.
Sec. 2. NRS 678A.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.470 1. The Board shall cause to be made and kept a
record of all proceedings at regular and special meetings of the
Board. These records are open to public inspection.
2. Any and all information and data prepared or obtained by
the Board or by an agent or employee of the Board relating to a
holder of or an applicant for a medical cannabis establishment
license pursuant to NRS 678B.210, other than the name of a licensee
and each owner, officer and board member of the licensee and
information relating to the scoring and ranking of applications and
the imposition of disciplinary action, are confidential and may be
revealed in whole or in part only in the course of the necessary
administration of this title or upon the lawful order of a court of
competent jurisdiction. The Board may reveal such information and
data to an authorized agent of any agency of the United States
Government, any state , [or] any political subdivision of a state or
the government of any foreign country [.] or a research institution
pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with the
regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS
678A.450. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, such
information and data may not be otherwise revealed without specific
authorization by the Board pursuant to the regulations of the Board.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any
information and data included in an application for an adult-use
cannabis establishment license or a registration card is confidential
and may be revealed in whole or in part only in the course of the
necessary administration of this title or upon the lawful order of a
court of competent jurisdiction. The name of the holder of an adult-
use cannabis establishment license and each owner, officer and
board member of the licensee and information relating to the scoring
and ranking of applications and the imposition of disciplinary action
are not confidential. The Board may reveal such information and
data to an authorized agent of any agency of the United States
Government, any state or any political subdivision of a state , [or]
the government of any foreign country [.] or a research institution
pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with the
regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS
678A.450. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, such
information and data may not be otherwise revealed without specific
authorization by the Board pursuant to the regulations of the Board.
4. All files, records, reports and other information and data
pertaining to matters related to cannabis in the possession of the
-
*AB149_R1*

– 5 –
Nevada Tax Commission or the Department of Taxation must be
made available to the Board as is necessary to the administration of
this title.
5. As used in this section, “information and data” means all
information and data in any form, including, without limitation, any
oral, written, audio, visual, digital or electronic form, and the term
includes, without limitation, any account, book, correspondence,
file, message, paper, record, report or other type of document,
including, without limitation, any document containing self-
evaluative assessments, self-critical analysis or self-appraisals of an
applicant’s or licensee’s compliance with statutory or regulatory
requirements.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Cannabis Policy Institute at the University of
Nevada, Las Vegas, for personnel, operating and travel expenses the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $657,241
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $657,241
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Cannabis Policy Institute at the University of
Nevada, Las Vegas, for direct costs relating to research conducted
by the Institute, including, without limitation, costs for the salaries
of researchers, stipends and travel relating to such research, but not
including indirect costs or overhead expenses, the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,000,000
2. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
-
*AB149_R1*

– 6 –
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB149_R1*